Utah statutes.
10-3-504.   Quorum defined.

The number of council members necessary to constitute a quorum is:

(1)  in a municipality with a seven-member council, four;

(2)  in a municipality with a five-member council, three; and

(3)  in a municipality operating under a six-member council form of government, three, excluding the mayor.



Amended by Chapter 19, 2008 General Session

